New Jersey, session 222, A2069.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the New Jersey Commission on Science, Innovation and Technology, shall conduct a study on the impact of artificial intelligence-powered technology and automation on the growth of the State's economy and shall prepare and submit a written report, within one year of the effective date of this act, to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, the chairperson of the Assembly Science, Innovation and Technology Committee and the chairperson of the Senate Economic Growth Committee, or their successor committees, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following: a.   the predicted impact of artificial intelligence on the labor market for highly-skilled and highly-educated professionals, such as doctors, lawyers, data analysts, and similarly skilled workers; b.   the occupations or industries most impacted by an expansion of the use of artificial intelligence; c.   the implications of these findings on the long-term plans for educating the next generation of highly-skilled employees; d.   new professions that may come into existence as a result of the expansion of the use of artificial intelligence and automation; and e.     the impact of artificial intelligence on labor productivity and the growth of the State's economy. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the submission of the written report to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to section 1 of this act.